Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 48 Substances Releasing Toxic Vapors

11-48-1.
“Person” defined.

“Person”, as used in this chapter, includes any individual, firm, or corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 25, § 1.

11-48-2.
Sale, possession, and use.

No person shall intentionally smell or inhale the fumes of any substance having the property of releasing toxic vapors for the purpose of causing a condition of intoxication, euphoria, excitement, exhilaration, stupefaction, or dulled senses or nervous system, nor possess, buy, or sell any substance for the purpose of violating or aiding another to violate this chapter; provided, that this chapter shall not apply to the inhalation of anesthesia for medical or dental purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 25, § 1.

11-48-3.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 191, § 1.